Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-930
Person; challenge
as to age; examination.

If a person is challenged
on the ground that he or she is not eighteen years of age or, during the years
in which a statewide general election is held, that he or she will not be
eighteen years of age by the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November
of such year, the person shall answer the following question on the form provided
by the election commissioner or county clerk: Will you be at least eighteen years of age on or
before the first Tuesday following the first Monday in November of this year?

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 273;

Laws 2010, LB325, § 6.